pt-PT: Design do diâmetro interno da flauta: Cónico; Cilíndrico; Cónico invertido; Em degraus; Outro
bg-BG: Дизайн на канала на блокфлейтата: Коничен; Цилиндричен; Обратно коничен; Стъпаловиден; Други
hr-HR: Dizajn otvora za snimanje: Konusni; Cilindrični; Obrnuto konusni; Stupnjeviti; Ostalo
fi: Nokkahuilun reikien asettelu: Kartiomainen; Lieriömäinen; Käänteiskartiomainen; Porrastettu; Muu
en: Recorder bore design: Conical; Cylindrical; Reverse-conical; Stepped; Other
nl: Blokfluit boringontwerp: Conisch; Cilindrisch; Omgekeerd conisch; Getrapt; Overig
it: Progettazione del foro del registratore: Conico; Cilindrico; Conico rovesciato; A gradini; Altro
sl-SI: Zasnova vrtine kljunaste flavte: Stožčast; Valjast; Obrnjeno stožčast; Stopenjski; Drugo
pl: Konstrukcja kanału fletu prostego: Stożkowy; Cylindryczny; Odwrotnie stożkowy; Schodkowy; Inne
sv: Utformning av blockflöjtens borrning: Konisk; Cylindrisk; Omvänt konisk; Stegad; Övrigt
da: Blokfløjtes udboringsdesign: Konisk; Cylindrisk; Omvendt konisk; Trinvis; Andet
pt-BR: Flauta doce furo design: Cônico; Cilíndrico; Cônico reverso; Escalonado; Outro
es: Diseño de orificio de la flauta dulce: Cónico; Cilíndrico; Cónico invertido; Escalonado; Otro
ko: 레코더 보어 설계: 원추형; 원통형; 역원추형; 계단형; 기타
de: Bohrungsdesign der Blockflöte: Konisch; Zylindrisch; Umgekehrt konisch; Gestuft; Sonstige
cs: Konstrukce vývrtu zobcové flétny: Kónický; Válcový; Obráceně kónický; Odstupňovaný; Ostatní
el: Σχεδιασμός της διαμέτρου του σωλήνα της φλογέρας: Κωνικός; Κυλινδρικός; Αντίστροφα κωνικός; Κλιμακωτός; Άλλο
sk-SK: Dizajn otvoru zobcovej flauty: Kónický; Valcovitý; Obrátený kónický; Stupňovitý; Iné
ja: リコーダーのボア設計: 円錐形; 円筒形; 逆円錐形; 階段状; その他
zh-CN: 竖笛内膛设计: 圆锥形; 圆柱形; 倒圆锥形; 阶梯形; 其他
vi: Thiết kế lỗ khoan máy ghi âm: Hình nón; Hình trụ; Hình nón ngược; Có bậc; Khác
nb: Bordesign for blokkfløyte: Konisk; Sylindrisk; Omvendt konisk; Trinnvis; Annet
zh-TW: 直笛管徑設計: 圓錐形; 圓柱形; 倒圓錐形; 階梯形; 其他
hu: Furulya lyukkialakítása: Kúpos; Hengeres; Fordított kúpos; Lépcsős; Egyéb
fr: Forme de la perce de la flûte à bec: Conique; Cylindrique; Conique inversé; À paliers; Autre
ro-RO: Designul alezajului flautului drept: Conic; Cilindric; Conic inversat; În trepte; Altele
ru: Конструкция канала блокфлейты: Коническая; Цилиндрическая; Обратно-коническая; Ступенчатая; Другое
lt-LT: Blokflauto kanalo dizainas: Kūginis; Cilindrinis; Atvirkščiai kūginis; Pakopinis; Kitas
tr: Kaydedici delik tasarımı: Konik; Silindirik; Ters konik; Kademeli; Diğer
th: การออกแบบท่อลมเครื่องรีคอร์เดอร์: ทรงกรวย; ทรงกระบอก; ทรงกรวยกลับหัว; แบบขั้นบันได; อื่นๆ